Tennessee, session 114, SB2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-17-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (2)(A) and substituting:
(A) The acquisition of an interest in land necessary for a road, highway, bridge,
or other structure, facility, or project used for public transportation, including an
associated sidewalk, public greenway, bicycle lane, pedestrian way, or proper slope
development;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2272
011571
- 1 -